California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 14.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.18.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no provision of this chapter shall be construed to limit the applicability of any other provision of the Insurance Code unless such provision is in conflict with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 14.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.02. Grandfathered Small Employer Health Insurance [10755. - 10755.18.7.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [10755. - 10755.01.]

10755.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Agent or broker” means a person or entity licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2 of Division 1.

(b) “Benefit plan design” means a specific health coverage product issued by a carrier to small employers, to trustees of associations that include small employers, or to individuals if the coverage is offered through employment or sponsored by an employer. It includes services covered and the levels of copayment and deductibles, and it may include the professional providers who are to provide those services and the sites where those services are to be provided. A benefit plan design may also be an integrated system for the financing
 and delivery of quality health care services which has significant incentives for the covered individuals to use the system.

(c) “Carrier” means any disability insurance company or any other entity that writes, issues, or administers health benefit plans that cover the employees of small employers, regardless of the situs of the contract or master policyholder.

(d) “Dependent” means the spouse or registered domestic partner, or child, of an eligible employee, subject to applicable terms of the health benefit plan covering the employee, and includes dependents of guaranteed association members if the association elects to include dependents under its health coverage at the same time it determines its membership composition pursuant to subdivision (t).

(e) “Eligible employee” means either of the following:

(1) Any permanent employee who is actively engaged on a full-time basis in the conduct of the business of the small employer with a normal workweek of an average of 30 hours per week over the course of a month, in the small employer’s regular place of business, who has met any statutorily authorized applicable waiting period requirements. The term does not include sole proprietors or the spouses of those sole proprietors, partners of a partnership or the spouses of those partners, or employees who work on a part-time, temporary, or substitute basis. It includes any eligible employee, as defined in this paragraph, who obtains coverage through a guaranteed association. Employees of employers purchasing through a guaranteed association are eligible employees if they would otherwise meet the definition except for the number of persons employed by the employer. A permanent employee who works at least 20 hours but not more than 29 hours is an eligible
 employee if all four of the following apply:

(A) The employee otherwise meets the definition of an eligible employee except for the number of hours worked.

(B) The employer offers the employee health coverage under a health benefit plan.

(C) All similarly situated individuals are offered coverage under the health benefit plan.

(D) The employee shall have worked at least 20 hours per normal workweek for at least 50 percent of the weeks in the previous calendar quarter. The insurer may request any necessary information to document the hours and time period in question, including, but not limited to, payroll records and employee wage and tax filings.

(2) Any member of a guaranteed association
 as defined in subdivision (t).

(f) “Enrollee” means an eligible employee or dependent who receives health coverage through the program from a participating carrier.

(g) “Financially impaired” means, for the purposes of this chapter, a carrier that, on or after the effective date of this chapter, is not insolvent and is either:

(1) Deemed by the commissioner to be potentially unable to fulfill its contractual obligations.

(2) Placed under an order of rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(h) “Health benefit plan” means a policy or contract written or administered by a carrier that arranges or provides health care benefits for the covered eligible employees of
 a small employer and their dependents. The term does not include accident only, credit, disability income, coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the United States government, Medicare supplement, long-term care insurance, dental, vision, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, automobile medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and that is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(i) “In force business” means an existing health benefit plan issued by the carrier to a small employer.

(j) “Late enrollee” means an eligible employee or dependent who has declined health coverage under a health benefit plan offered by a small employer at the time of the initial enrollment period provided under the terms of the health benefit plan
 and who subsequently requests enrollment in a health benefit plan of that small employer, provided that the initial enrollment period shall be a period of at least 30 days. It also means any member of an association that is a guaranteed association as well as any other person eligible to purchase through the guaranteed association when that person has failed to purchase coverage during the initial enrollment period provided under the terms of the guaranteed association’s health benefit plan and who subsequently requests enrollment in the plan, provided that the initial enrollment period shall be a period of at least 30 days. However, an eligible employee, another person eligible for coverage through a guaranteed association pursuant to subdivision (t), or an eligible dependent shall not be considered a late enrollee if any of the following is applicable:

(1) The individual meets all of the following requirements:

(A) He or she was covered under another employer health benefit plan, the Healthy Families Program, the Access for Infants and Mothers (AIM) Program, the Medi-Cal program, or coverage through the California Health Benefit Exchange at the time the individual was eligible to enroll.

(B) He or she certified at the time of the initial enrollment that coverage under another employer health benefit plan, the Healthy Families Program, the AIM Program, the Medi-Cal program, or the California Health Benefit Exchange was the reason for declining enrollment provided that, if the individual was covered under another employer health plan, the individual was given the opportunity to make the certification required by this subdivision and was notified that failure to do so could result in later treatment as a late enrollee.

(C) He or
 she has lost or will lose coverage under another employer health benefit plan as a result of termination of employment of the individual or of a person through whom the individual was covered as a dependent, change in employment status of the individual, or of a person through whom the individual was covered as a dependent, the termination of the other plan’s coverage, cessation of an employer’s contribution toward an employee or dependent’s coverage, death of the person through whom the individual was covered as a dependent, legal separation, or divorce; or he or she has lost or will lose coverage under the Healthy Families Program, the AIM Program, the Medi-Cal program, or the California Health Benefit Exchange.

(D) He or she requests enrollment within 30 days after termination of coverage or employer contribution toward coverage provided under another employer health benefit plan, or requests enrollment within 60 days after termination of
 Medi-Cal program coverage, AIM Program coverage, Healthy Families Program coverage, or coverage offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange.

(2) The individual is employed by an employer who offers multiple health benefit plans and the individual elects a different plan during an open enrollment period.

(3) A court has ordered that coverage be provided for a spouse or minor child under a covered employee’s health benefit plan.

(4) (A) In the case of an eligible employee as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), the carrier cannot produce a written statement from the employer stating that the individual or the person through whom an individual was eligible to be covered as a dependent, prior to declining coverage, was provided with, and signed acknowledgment of, an explicit written notice in boldface
 type specifying that failure to elect coverage during the initial enrollment period permits the carrier to impose, at the time of the individual’s later decision to elect coverage, an exclusion from eligibility for coverage until the next open enrollment period, unless the individual meets the criteria specified in paragraph (1), (2), or (3). This exclusion from eligibility for coverage shall not be considered a waiting period in violation of Section 10198.7 or 10755.08.

(B) In the case of an eligible employee who is a guaranteed association member, the plan cannot produce a written statement from the guaranteed association stating that the association sent a written notice in boldface type to all potentially eligible association members at their last known address prior to the initial enrollment period informing members that failure to elect coverage during the initial enrollment period permits the plan to impose, at the time of the member’s
 later decision to elect coverage, an exclusion from eligibility for coverage until the next open enrollment period, unless the member can demonstrate that he or she meets the requirements of subparagraphs (A), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1) or meets the requirements of paragraph (2) or (3). This exclusion from eligibility for coverage shall not be considered a waiting period in violation of Section 10198.7 or 10755.08.

(C) In the case of an employer or person who is not a member of an association, was eligible to purchase coverage through a guaranteed association, and did not do so, and would not be eligible to purchase guaranteed coverage unless purchased through a guaranteed association, the employer or person can demonstrate that he or she meets the requirements of subparagraphs (A), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1), or meets the requirements of paragraph (2) or (3), or that he or she recently had a change in status that would make him or her
 eligible and that application for coverage was made within 30 days of the change.

(5) The individual is an employee or dependent who meets the criteria described in paragraph (1) and was under a COBRA continuation provision and the coverage under that provision has been exhausted. For purposes of this section, the definition of “COBRA” set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 10116.5 shall apply.

(6) The individual is a dependent of an enrolled eligible employee who has lost or will lose his or her coverage under the Healthy Families Program, the AIM Program, the Medi-Cal program, or the California Health Benefit Exchange and requests enrollment within 60 days after termination of that coverage.

(7) The individual is an eligible employee who previously declined coverage under an employer health benefit plan, including
 a plan offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange, and who has subsequently acquired a dependent who would be eligible for coverage as a dependent of the employee through marriage, birth, adoption, or placement for adoption, and who enrolls for coverage under that employer health benefit plan on his or her behalf and on behalf of his or her dependent within 30 days following the date of marriage, birth, adoption, or placement for adoption, in which case the effective date of coverage shall be the first day of the month following the date the completed request for enrollment is received in the case of marriage, or the date of birth, or the date of adoption or placement for adoption, whichever applies. Notice of the special enrollment rights contained in this paragraph shall be provided by the employer to an employee at or before the time the employee is offered an opportunity to enroll in plan coverage.

(8) The individual is an
 eligible employee who has declined coverage for himself or herself or his or her dependents during a previous enrollment period because his or her dependents were covered by another employer health benefit plan, including a plan offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange, at the time of the previous enrollment period. That individual may enroll himself or herself or his or her dependents for plan coverage during a special open enrollment opportunity if his or her dependents have lost or will lose coverage under that other employer health benefit plan. The special open enrollment opportunity shall be requested by the employee not more than 30 days after the date that the other health coverage is exhausted or terminated. Upon enrollment, coverage shall be effective not later than the first day of the first calendar month beginning after the date the request for enrollment is received. Notice of the special enrollment rights contained in this paragraph shall be provided by the employer to an
 employee at or before the time the employee is offered an opportunity to enroll in plan coverage.

(k) “Preexisting condition provision” means a policy provision that excludes coverage for charges or expenses incurred during a specified period following the insured’s effective date of coverage, as to a condition for which medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was recommended or received during a specified period immediately preceding the effective date of coverage.

(l) “Creditable coverage” means:

(1) Any individual or group policy, contract, or program, that is written or administered by a disability insurer, health care service plan, fraternal benefits society, self-insured employer plan, or any other entity, in this state or elsewhere, and that arranges or provides medical, hospital, and surgical coverage
 not designed to supplement other private or governmental plans. The term includes continuation or conversion coverage but does not include accident only, credit, coverage for onsite medical clinics, disability income, Medicare supplement, long-term care, dental, vision, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising out of a workers’ compensation or similar law, automobile medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and that is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(2) The federal Medicare Program pursuant to Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.).

(3) The Medicaid program pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(4) Any other publicly sponsored program, provided in this state or elsewhere, of medical, hospital, and surgical care.

(5) Chapter 55 (commencing with Section 1071) of Title 10 of the United States Code (Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS)).

(6) A medical care program of the Indian Health Service or of a tribal organization.

(7) A health plan offered under Chapter 89 (commencing with Section 8901) of Title 5 of the United States Code (Federal Employees Health Benefits Program (FEHBP)).

(8) A public health plan as defined in federal regulations authorized by Section 2701(c)(1)(I) of the federal Public Health Service Act, as amended by Public Law 104-191,
 the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.

(9) A health benefit plan under Section 5(e) of the federal Peace Corps Act (22 U.S.C. Sec. 2504(e)).

(10) Any other creditable coverage as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 2704 of Title XXVII of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-3(c)).

(m) “Rating period” means the period for which premium rates established by a carrier are in effect and shall be no less than 12 months from the date of issuance or renewal of the health benefit plan.

(n) “Risk adjusted employee risk rate” means the rate determined for an eligible employee of a small employer in a particular risk category after applying the risk adjustment factor.

(o) “Risk adjustment factor” means the percent adjustment to be applied equally to each standard employee risk rate for a particular small employer, based upon any expected deviations from standard claims. This factor may not be more than 110 percent or less than 90 percent.

(p) “Risk category” means the following characteristics of an eligible employee: age, geographic region, and family size of the employee, plus the benefit plan design selected by the small employer.

(1) No more than the following age categories may be used in determining premium rates:

Under 30

30–39

40–49

50–54

55–59

60–64

65 and over.

However, for the 65 years of age and over category, separate premium rates may be specified depending upon whether coverage under the health benefit plan will be primary or secondary to benefits provided by the federal Medicare Program pursuant to Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act.

(2) Small employer carriers shall base rates to small employers using no more than the following family size categories:

(A) Single.

(B) Married couple or registered domestic partners.

(C) One adult and child or children.

(D) Married couple or registered
 domestic partners and child or children.

(3) (A) In determining rates for small employers, a carrier that operates statewide shall use no more than nine geographic regions in the state, have no region smaller than an area in which the first three digits of all its ZIP Codes are in common within a county, and shall divide no county into more than two regions. Carriers shall be deemed to be operating statewide if their coverage area includes 90 percent or more of the state’s population. Geographic regions established pursuant to this section shall, as a group, cover the entire state, and the area encompassed in a geographic region shall be separate and distinct from areas encompassed in other geographic regions. Geographic regions may be noncontiguous.

(B) In determining rates for small employers, a carrier that does not operate statewide shall use no more than
 the number of geographic regions in the state than is determined by the following formula: the population, as determined in the last federal census, of all counties which are included in their entirety in a carrier’s service area divided by the total population of the state, as determined in the last federal census, multiplied by nine. The resulting number shall be rounded to the nearest whole integer. No region may be smaller than an area in which the first three digits of all its ZIP Codes are in common within a county and no county may be divided into more than two regions. The area encompassed in a geographic region shall be separate and distinct from areas encompassed in other geographic regions. Geographic regions may be noncontiguous. A carrier shall not have less than one geographic area.

(q) (1) “Small employer” means either of the following:

(A) For
 plan years commencing on or after January 1, 2014, and on or before December 31, 2015, any person, firm, proprietary or nonprofit corporation, partnership, public agency, or association that is actively engaged in business or service, that, on at least 50 percent of its working days during the preceding calendar quarter or preceding calendar year, employed at least one, but no more than 50, eligible employees, the majority of whom were employed within this state, that was not formed primarily for purposes of buying health benefit plans, and in which a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. For plan years commencing on or after January 1, 2016, any person, firm, proprietary or nonprofit corporation, partnership, public agency, or association that is actively engaged in business or service, that, on at least 50 percent of its working days during the preceding calendar quarter or preceding calendar year, employed at least one, but no more than 100, eligible employees, the majority of whom were
 employed within this state, that was not formed primarily for purposes of buying health benefit plans, and in which a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining whether to apply the calendar quarter or calendar year test, a carrier shall use the test that ensures eligibility if only one test would establish eligibility. In determining the number of eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies and that are eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of state taxation shall be considered one employer. Subsequent to the issuance of a health benefit plan to a small employer pursuant to this chapter, and for the purpose of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, provisions of this chapter that apply to a small employer shall continue to apply until the plan contract anniversary following the date the employer no longer meets the requirements of this definition. It
 includes any small employer as defined in this subparagraph who purchases coverage through a guaranteed association, any employer purchasing coverage for employees through a guaranteed association, and any small employer as defined in this paragraph who purchases coverage through any arrangement, but does not include multiple employer welfare arrangements regulated pursuant to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 742.20) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 that provide health care benefits to their members on a self-funded or partially self-funded basis and that comply with small group health reforms.

(B) Any guaranteed association, as defined in subdivision (s), that purchases health coverage for members of the association.

(2) For plan years commencing on or after January 1, 2019, for purposes of determining whether an employer has one employee, sole proprietors and their
 spouses, and partners of a partnership and their spouses, are not considered employees.

(r) “Standard employee risk rate” means the rate applicable to an eligible employee in a particular risk category in a small employer group.

(s) “Guaranteed association” means a nonprofit organization comprised of a group of individuals or employers who associate based solely on participation in a specified profession or industry, accepting for membership any individual or employer meeting its membership criteria which (1) includes one or more small employers as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (q), (2) does not condition membership directly or indirectly on the health or claims history of any person, (3) uses membership dues solely for and in consideration of the membership and membership benefits, except that the amount of the dues shall not depend on whether the
 member applies for or purchases insurance offered by the association, (4) is organized and maintained in good faith for purposes unrelated to insurance, (5) has been in active existence on January 1, 1992, and for at least five years prior to that date, (6) has been offering health insurance to its members for at least five years prior to January 1, 1992, (7) has a constitution and bylaws, or other analogous governing documents that provide for election of the governing board of the association by its members, (8) offers any benefit plan design that is purchased to all individual members and employer members in this state, (9) includes any member choosing to enroll in the benefit plan design offered to the association provided that the member has agreed to make the required premium payments, and (10) covers at least 1,000 persons with the carrier with which it contracts. The requirement of 1,000 persons may be met if component chapters of a statewide association contracting separately with the same carrier
 cover at least 1,000 persons in the aggregate.

This subdivision applies regardless of whether a master policy by an admitted insurer is delivered directly to the association or a trust formed for or sponsored by an association to administer benefits for association members.

For purposes of this subdivision, an association formed by a merger of two or more associations after January 1, 1992, and otherwise meeting the criteria of this subdivision shall be deemed to have been in active existence on January 1, 1992, if its predecessor organizations had been in active existence on January 1, 1992, and for at least five years prior to that date and otherwise met the criteria of this subdivision.

(t) “Members of a guaranteed association” means any individual or employer meeting the association’s membership criteria if that person is a member of the association and
 chooses to purchase health coverage through the association. At the association’s discretion, it may also include employees of association members, association staff, retired members, retired employees of members, and surviving spouses and dependents of deceased members. However, if an association chooses to include those persons as members of the guaranteed association, the association must so elect in advance of purchasing coverage from a plan. Health plans may require an association to adhere to the membership composition it selects for up to 12 months.

(u) “Grandfathered health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan that constitutes a grandfathered health plan.

(v) “Grandfathered health plan” has the meaning set forth in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(w) “Nongrandfathered health benefit plan” means a health benefit
 plan that is not a grandfathered health plan.

(x) “Plan year” has the meaning set forth in Section 144.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(y) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued thereunder.

(z) “Waiting period” means a period that is required to pass with respect to the employee before the employee is eligible to be covered for benefits under the terms of the contract.

(aa) “Registered domestic partner” means a person who has established a domestic partnership as described in Section 297 of the Family
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 700, Sec. 10.   (SB 1375)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.01.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “health benefit plan” does not include policies or certificates of specified disease or hospital confinement indemnity provided that the carrier offering those policies or certificates complies with the following:

(1) The carrier files, on or before March 1 of each year, a certification with the commissioner that contains the statement and information described in paragraph (2).

(2) The certification required in paragraph (1) shall contain the following:

(A) A statement from the carrier certifying that policies or certificates described in this section (i) are being offered and
 marketed as supplemental health insurance and not as a substitute for coverage that provides essential health benefits as defined by the state pursuant to Section 1302 of PPACA, and (ii) contain the disclosure forms as described in Section 10603 with the following statement prominently on the first page: “This is a supplement to health insurance. It is not a substitute for essential health benefits or minimum essential coverage as required under federal law.”

(B) A summary description of each policy or certificate described in this section, including the average annual premium rates, or range of premium rates in cases where premiums vary by age, gender, or other factors, charged for the policies and certificates issued or delivered in this state.

(3) In the case of a policy or certificate that is described in this section and that is offered for the first time in this state for plan years on or after January 1, 2014, the carrier files with the commissioner the information and statement required
 in paragraph (2) at least 30 days prior to the date such a policy or certificate is issued or delivered in this state.

(b) As used in this section, “policies or certificates of specified disease” and “policies or certificates of hospital confinement indemnity” mean policies or certificates of insurance sold to an insured to supplement other health insurance coverage as specified in this section. An insurer issuing a “policy or certificate of specified disease” or a “policy or certificate of hospital confinement indemnity” shall require that the person to be insured is covered by an individual or group policy or contract that arranges or provides medical, hospital, and surgical coverage not designed to supplement other private or governmental plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Small Employer Carrier Requirements [10755.02. - 10755.18.7.]

10755.02.

(a) This chapter shall apply only to grandfathered health benefit plans and only with respect to plan years commencing on or after January 1, 2014.

(b) All carriers administering health benefit plans that cover employees of small employers shall be subject to this chapter if any one of the following conditions are met:

(1) Any portion of the premium for any health benefit plan or benefits is paid by a small employer, or any covered individual is reimbursed, whether through wage adjustments or otherwise, by a small employer for any portion of the premium.

(2) The health benefit plan is treated by the small
 employer or any of the covered individuals as part of a plan or program for the purposes of Section 106 or 162 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.02.1.

Any person or entity subject to the requirements of this chapter shall comply with the standards set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3750) of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Family Code and Section 14124.94 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.03.

The commissioner shall have the authority to determine whether a health benefit plan is covered by this chapter, and to determine whether an employer is a small employer within the meaning of Section 10755.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.04.

(a) The department may adopt emergency regulations implementing this chapter no later than August 31, 2013. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as or substantially equivalent to an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section.

(b) The initial adoption of emergency regulations implementing this section and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.
 The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations may be adopted.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 15.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.05.

(a) (1) Each carrier, except a self-funded employer, shall fairly and affirmatively renew all of the carrier’s health benefit plans that are sold to small employers or associations that include small employers.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an association, or a trust established and maintained by an association to receive a master insurance policy issued by an admitted insurer and to administer the benefits thereof solely for association members, to offer, market or sell a benefit plan design to those who are not members of the association. However, if the association markets, offers or sells a benefit plan design to those who
 are not members of the association it is subject to the requirements of this section. This shall apply to an association that otherwise meets the requirements of paragraph (6) formed by merger of two or more associations after January 1, 1992, if the predecessor organizations had been in active existence on January 1, 1992, and for at least five years prior to that date and met the requirements of paragraph (3).

(3) A carrier which (A) effective January 1, 1992, and at least 20 years prior to that date, markets, offers, or sells benefit plan designs only to all members of one association and (B) does not market, offer or sell any other individual, selected group, or group policy or contract providing medical, hospital and surgical benefits shall not be required to market, offer, or sell to those who are not members of the association.
 However, if the carrier markets, offers or sells any benefit plan design or any other individual, selected group, or group policy or contract providing medical, hospital and surgical benefits to those who are not members of the association it is subject to the requirements of this section.

(4) Each carrier that sells health benefit plans to members of one association pursuant to paragraph (3) shall submit an annual statement to the commissioner which states that the carrier is selling health benefit plans pursuant to paragraph (3) and which, for the one association, lists all the information required by paragraph (5).

(5) Each carrier that sells health benefit plans to members of any association shall submit an annual statement to the commissioner which lists each association to which
 the carrier sells health benefit plans, the industry or profession which is served by the association, the association’s membership criteria, a list of officers, the state in which the association is organized, and the site of its principal office.

(6) For purposes of paragraphs (2) and (3), an association is a nonprofit organization comprised of a group of individuals or employers who associate based solely on participation in a specified profession or industry, accepting for membership any individual or small employer meeting its membership criteria, which do not condition membership directly or indirectly on the health or claims history of any person, which uses membership dues solely for and in consideration of the membership and membership benefits, except that the amount of the dues shall not depend on whether the member applies
 for or purchases insurance offered by the association, which is organized and maintained in good faith for purposes unrelated to insurance, which has been in active existence on January 1, 1992, and at least five years prior to that date, which has a constitution and bylaws, or other analogous governing documents which provide for election of the governing board of the association by its members, which has contracted with one or more carriers to offer one or more health benefit plans to all individual members and small employer members in this state.

(b) Each carrier shall make available to each small employer all nongrandfathered health benefit plans that the carrier offers or sells to small employers or to associations that include small employers. Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 10755, for purposes of this subdivision,
 companies that are affiliated companies or that are eligible to file a consolidated income tax return shall be treated as one carrier.

(c) Each carrier shall do all of the following:

(1) Prepare a brochure that summarizes all of its health benefit plans and make this summary available to small employers, agents, and brokers upon request. The summary shall include for each health benefit plan information on benefits provided, a generic description of the manner in which services are provided, such as how access to providers is limited, benefit limitations, required copayments and deductibles, standard employee risk rates, and a telephone number that can be called for more detailed benefit information. Carriers are required to keep the information contained in the brochure accurate
 and up to date, and, upon updating the brochure, send copies to agents and brokers representing the carrier. Any entity that provides administrative services only with regard to a benefit plan design written or issued by another carrier shall not be required to prepare a summary brochure which includes that benefit plan design.

(2) For each health benefit plan, prepare a more detailed evidence of coverage and make it available to small employers, agents and brokers upon request. The evidence of coverage shall contain all information that a prudent buyer would need to be aware of in making selections of benefit plan designs. An entity that provides administrative services only with regard to a benefit plan design written or issued by another carrier shall not be required to prepare an evidence of coverage for that benefit plan design.

(3) Provide to small employers and agents and brokers, upon request, for any given small employer the sum of the standard employee risk rates and the sum of the risk adjusted employee risk rates. When requesting this information, small employers and agents and brokers shall provide the plan with the information the plan needs to determine the small employer’s risk adjusted employee risk rate.

(4) Provide copies of the current summary brochure to all agents or brokers who represent the carrier and, upon updating the brochure, send copies of the updated brochure to agents and brokers representing the carrier for the purpose of selling health benefit plans.

(5) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 10755, for purposes
 of this subdivision, companies that are affiliated companies or that are eligible to file a consolidated income tax return shall be treated as one carrier.

(d) No carrier, agent, or broker shall induce or otherwise encourage a small employer to separate or otherwise exclude an eligible employee from a health benefit plan which, in the case of an eligible employee meeting the definition in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 10755, is provided in connection with the employee’s employment or which, in the case of an eligible employee as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 10755, is provided in connection with a guaranteed association.

(e) No carrier or agent or broker shall, directly or indirectly, engage in the following activities:
